lexd_components/hyx-nouns_regular_list.lexd
################################
#### Lexicon of regular nouns from Kouyoumdjian's dictionary "A comprehensive dictionary Armenian-English"
#### This is a general category for any noun which:
#### *  has single POS
#### * doesn't have a suffix which triggers a special declension class
#### * is not headed by an irregular root
#### Some elements are likely incorrectly here
#### A long-standing issue is to use corpora to find nouns which get irregular inflection
#### Or which compound-special pluralization patterns (ie., those which need the {mono} diacritic for the bracketing paradox)


LEXICON NounReg
մեղրադդում:մեղրադդում
մոմադդում:մոմադդում
դդում:դդում
մշկադդում:մշկադդում
իժադդում:իժադդում
օձադդում:օձադդում
դառնադդում:դառնադդում
շաքարադդում:շաքարադդում
մականադդում:մականադդում
